Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2240.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1719-A(11) of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended to read:Section 1719-A. Contents of Application.--An application to establish a charter school shall include all of the following information:* * *(11) A description of and address of [the] any physical facility in which the charter school will be located [and the ownership thereof and any lease arrangements.], provided that each physical facility shall be located within the boundaries of a single school district. The charter school shall:1234567891011121314151617181920 (i) Provide the school district with the address and information on ownership or lease arrangements for each physical facility.(ii) Notify the school district of any change in the information under this paragraph within ten (10) days of the change.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2240PN2934 - 2 - 12345678